Mississippi, session 2026, HB372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be denied employment solely because he or she has been convicted of a felony by any of the following actions: (a)  Prohibiting the person from applying for an open position; (b)  Disqualifying the person for an open position for which he or she is otherwise qualified; or (c)  Dismissing or terminating the person from his or her current position. (2)  For purposes of this section, a "felony" means a crime that is a felony under the laws of this state or that is punishable by imprisonment for one (1) year or more in a federal court or a court of competent jurisdiction of any other state. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.